Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3326.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; AFRICAN DEVELOPMENT CENTER.new text end new text begin (a) $4,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the African Development Center for the purposes listed in paragraph (b). This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin (b) Of the amount in paragraph (a): new text end new text begin (1) $2,000,000 is for loans to assist small business owners in purchasing commercial real estate; new text end new text begin (2) $910,000 is for loan loss reserves to support loan volume growth and attract additional capital; and new text end new text begin (3) $1,090,000 is for increasing organizational capacity building. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; SOCIAL BENEFIT CORPORATIONS.new text end new text begin (a) $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for grants to social benefit corporations, as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 304A.011, that provide employment opportunities to underserved, low-income, and hard-to-employ populations in Minnesota. Grant money must be used to expand workforce capacity and increase employment opportunities within social benefit corporations that currently employ up to 15 individuals with the goal of expanding employment to 30 individuals. Money may be used to subsidize the wages of new hires, for workforce training, and for employment support services, including job coaching and retention initiatives. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin (b) Each recipient of a grant must submit a report to the commissioner of employment and economic development on the use of grant money, including the number of new employees hired as a result of the grant and retention and job satisfaction metrics, within one year of receiving a grant. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin APPROPRIATION; SMALL BUSINESS JOB CREATION IN THE ST. PAUL MIDWAY AREA.new text end new text begin (a) $300,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for grants to support small businesses in the St. Paul Midway area and foster economic growth and job creation. Grants should target the needs of African immigrant business owners and support business stability and workforce expansion. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin (b) Each recipient of a grant must submit a report to the commissioner of employment and economic development on the use of grant money, the number of new employees hired as a result of the grant, and the economic impact of the grant within one year of receiving a grant. new text end